test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-mayakask-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mayakask - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, palate    AEW V-initial NDI3
     mayakask+N+A+Sg: mayakask
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nayakask
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kayakask
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nayakaskonân
     mayakask+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kayakaskonaw
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kayakaskowâw

     mayakask+N+A+Pl: mayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kayakaskwa
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nayakaskonâna
     mayakask+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kayakaskonawa
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kayakaskowâwa

     mayakask+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: oskîsik
     mayakask+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: wayakaskowâwa
     mayakask+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: wayakaskoyiwa
     mayakask+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: wayakaskoyiwa

     mayakask+N+A+Loc: mayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: nayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: nayakaskonâhk
     mayakask+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kayakaskonâhk
     mayakask+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kayakaskowâhk
     mayakask+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: wayakaskohk
     mayakask+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: wayakaskowâhk
     mayakask+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: wayakaskoyihk
     mayakask+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: wayakaskoyihk

     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: mayakaskos
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [mayakaskos, mayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nayakaskos, nayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kayakaskos, kayakaskosis]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nayakaskosinân, nayakaskosisinân]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kayakaskosinaw, kayakaskosisinaw]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kayakaskosiwâw, kayakaskosisiwâw]

     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [mayakaskosa, mayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nayakaskosa, nayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kayakaskosa, kayakaskosisa]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nayakaskosinâna, nayakaskosisinâna]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kayakaskosinawa, kayakaskosisinawa]
     mayakask+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kayakaskosiwâwa, kayakaskosisiwâwa]
